Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 11. Domestic Fish Farming.

§ 69-7-501.
Definitions.

In recognition of the fact that domestic fish farming has become an important part of the agricultural economy of this state, the Legislature hereby determines and declares that whenever any of the statutes, laws, or regulations promulgated pursuant thereto, shall use any of the following terms, such terms so used and when used, shall be deemed and construed to include within the common or statutory definition thereof, the following:

The term “agriculture” or “agricultural pursuit” or any similar term shall include the cultivation, growing, harvesting and/or marketing of domesticated fish.

The term “cultivated crop” shall include domesticated fish which are grown, managed or harvested on an annual, semiannual, biennial or short interval basis.

The term “livestock” shall include domesticated fish which are grown, managed, harvested and/or marketed as a cultivated crop.

The term “domesticated fish” shall be understood to mean any fish that are spawned and grown, managed, harvested and marketed on an annual, semiannual, biennial or short term basis, in privately owned waters.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4435-91; Laws, 1964, ch. 235, §§ 1, 2, eff from and after passage (approved June 11, 1964).

§ 69-7-503.
Construction of article.

This article shall not be construed to permit the sale of any fish prohibited from being sold by law, but shall be supplementary thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4435-91; Laws, 1964, ch. 235, §§ 1, 2, eff from and after passage (approved June 11, 1964).